Illinois, session 104th, SB1104.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Hydraulic Fracturing Tax Act is 5amended by changing Section 2-5 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 450/2-5)7    Sec. 2-5. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8"Illinois Hydraulic Fracturing Tax Act".9(Source: P.A. 98-22, eff. 6-17-13.)